Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-610] Federally funded programs;
exemption. Requirements relating to mandated coverages shall not be
applicable to any mutual benefit society offering health insurance under a
federally funded program under the Social Security Act, as amended; provided
that this exemption shall apply only to that part of the mutual benefit
society's business under the federally funded program. [L 1999, c 159, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next